Washington statutes.
RCW 39.30.050

Contracts to require use of paper products meeting certain specifications.

Any contract by a governmental unit shall require the use of paper products to the maximum extent economically feasible that meet the specifications established by the department of enterprise services under RCW 39.26.255.

[ 2015 c 225 s 41; 1982 c 61 s 4.]

NOTES: